Hawaii statutes.
§214-4 Rules. The department of budget
and finance and the office of planning may adopt rules and regulations
necessary and convenient for the administration and implementation of this
chapter subject to approval by the governor. [L 1965, c 234, §5; Supp, §138F-5;
HRS §214-4; am L 1987, c 336, §8; am L 1996, c 299, §3]

Cross References

Adoption of rules,
see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next